Missouri, session 2026, SB1300.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 160.665, 170.315, 590.010, and
590.205, RSMo, are repealed and four new sections enacted in
lieu thereof, to be known as sections 160.665, 170.315, 590.010,
and 590.205, to read as follows:
160.665. 1. Any school district or charter school
within the state may designate one or more [elementary or
secondary school teachers or administrators] employees of
the district or charter school as a school protection
officer. The responsibilities and duties of a school
protection officer are voluntary and shall be in addition to
the normal responsibilities and duties of the [teacher or
administrator] employee. Any compensation for additional
duties relating to service as a school protection officer
shall be funded by the local school district, with no state
funds used for such purpose.
2. Any person designated by a school district or
charter school as a school protection officer shall be
authorized to carry concealed firearms or a self-defense
spray device in any school in the district. A self-defense
spray device shall mean any device that is capable of
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1300 2
carrying, and that ejects, releases, or emits, a nonlethal
solution or projectile capable of incapacitating a violent
threat. The school protection officer shall not be
permitted to allow any firearm or device out of his or her
personal control while that firearm or device is on school
property. Any school protection officer who violates this
subsection may be removed immediately from the classroom and
subject to employment termination proceedings.
3. A school protection officer has the same authority
to detain or use force against any person on school property
as provided to any other person under chapter 563.
4. Upon detention of a person under subsection 3 of
this section, the school protection officer shall
immediately notify a school administrator and a school
resource officer, if such officer is present at the school.
If the person detained is a student then the parents or
guardians of the student shall also be immediately notified
by a school administrator.
5. Any person detained by a school protection officer
shall be turned over to a school administrator or law
enforcement officer as soon as practically possible and
shall not be detained by a school protection officer for
more than one hour.
6. Any [teacher or administrator of an elementary or
secondary school] employee of a school district or charter
school who seeks to be designated as a school protection
officer shall request such designation in writing, and
submit it to the superintendent of the school district or
the executive director of the charter school governing board
which employs him or her [as a teacher or administrator].
Along with this request, any [teacher or administrator]
employee seeking to carry a concealed firearm on school

SB 1300 3
property shall also submit proof that he or she has a valid
concealed carry endorsement or permit, and all [teachers and
administrators] employees seeking the designation of school
protection officer shall submit a certificate of school
protection officer training program completion from a
training program approved by the director of the department
of public safety which demonstrates that such person has
successfully completed the training requirements established
by the POST commission under chapter 590 for school
protection officers.
7. No school district or charter school may designate
[a teacher or administrator] an employee as a school
protection officer unless such person has successfully
completed a school protection officer training program,
which has been approved by the director of the department of
public safety. No school district or charter school shall
allow a school protection officer to carry a concealed
firearm on school property unless the school protection
officer has a valid concealed carry endorsement or permit.
8. Any school district or charter school that
designates [a teacher or administrator] an employee as a
school protection officer shall, within thirty days, notify,
in writing, the director of the department of public safety
of the designation, which shall include the following:
(1) The full name, date of birth, and address of the
officer;
(2) The name of the school district; and
(3) The date such person was designated as a school
protection officer.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary,
any identifying information collected under the authority of

SB 1300 4
this subsection shall not be considered public information
and shall not be subject to a request for public records
made under chapter 610.
9. A school district or charter school may revoke the
designation of a person as a school protection officer for
any reason and shall immediately notify the designated
school protection officer in writing of the revocation. The
school district or charter school shall also within thirty
days of the revocation notify the director of the department
of public safety in writing of the revocation of the
designation of such person as a school protection officer.
A person who has had the designation of school protection
officer revoked has no right to appeal the revocation
decision.
10. The director of the department of public safety
shall maintain a listing of all persons designated by school
districts and charter schools as school protection officers
and shall make this list available to all law enforcement
agencies.
11. [Before a school district may designate a teacher
100 or administrator] If an employee submits a request for
101 designation as a school protection officer to the
102 superintendent of the school district or executive director
103 of the charter school governing board, the school board or
104 governing board shall promptly hold a public hearing [on]
105 and determine by a vote at the hearing whether to allow such
106 designation. Notice of the hearing shall be published at
107 least fifteen days before the date of the hearing in a
108 newspaper of general circulation within the city or county
109 in which the school district is located. The request for
110 designation as a school protection officer shall also
111 require the school board [may determine at] or governing

SB 1300 5
112 board to hold a closed meeting, as "closed meeting" is
113 defined under section 610.010, and determine by a vote at
114 the closed meeting whether to authorize the designated
115 school protection officer to carry a concealed firearm or a
116 self-defense spray device. The school board or governing
117 board shall hold the closed meeting and vote on the issue
118 regardless of whether the employee specifically requested
119 authorization to carry a concealed firearm or a self-defense
120 spray device on school property in his or her request for
121 designation as a school protection officer.
122 12. Each school district and charter school shall
123 consider implementing a school protection officer program
124 consistent with the provisions of this section. The school
125 board of each school district and governing board of each
126 charter school shall hold a public hearing and determine by
127 a vote at the hearing whether to implement such a program.
128 13. Any school board or governing board that approves
129 a school protection officer program by a vote described in
130 subsection 11 of this section shall notify all the employees
131 of the school district or charter school of the program and
132 the option to request designation as a school protection
133 officer.
170.315. 1. (1) There is hereby established the
"Active Shooter and Intruder Response Training for Schools
Program (ASIRT)".
(2) For each school year ending before July 1, [2026]
2027, each school district and charter school [may] shall
include in its teacher and school employee training a
component on how to properly respond to students who provide
them with information about a threatening situation and how
to address situations in which there is a potentially
dangerous or armed intruder in the school. Training [may]

SB 1300 6
shall also include information and techniques on how to
address situations where an active shooter is present in the
school or on school property.
(3) For the 2026-27 school year and all subsequent
school years, each school district and charter school shall
include in its teacher and school employee training
components on:
(a) How to properly respond to students who provide a
teacher or school employee with information about a
threatening situation;
(b) How to address situations in which there is a
potentially dangerous or armed intruder in the school;
(c) Information and techniques on how to address
situations where an active shooter is present in the school
or on school property;
(d) How to identify potential threats or safety
hazards; and
(e) Protocols for emergencies in the school including,
but not limited to:
a. Evacuations;
b. Severe weather;
c. Earthquakes;
d. Fire; and
e. Medical.
2. For the 2026-27 school year and all subsequent
school years, each school district and charter school that
elects to provide such training shall conduct the training
on an annual basis. The length of training shall be
determined by the school district or charter school electing
to provide such training.
3. All school [personnel] employees may participate in
a simulated active shooter and intruder response drill

SB 1300 7
conducted and led by law enforcement professionals or school
safety professionals. Each drill shall include an
explanation of its purpose and a safety briefing.
4. All instructors for the program shall be certified
by the department of public safety's peace officers
standards training commission.
5. School districts and charter schools may consult
and collaborate with law enforcement authorities, emergency
response agencies, and other organizations and entities
trained to deal with active shooters or potentially
dangerous or armed intruders.
6. Public schools shall actively foster an environment
in which students feel comfortable sharing information they
have regarding a potentially threatening or dangerous
situation with a responsible adult. As part of each public
school's efforts to actively foster such environment, each
public school shall annually provide age-appropriate
information and training on the Missouri state highway
patrol's Courage2ReportMO (C2R) reporting mechanism or its
successor reporting mechanism.
7. For the 2026-27 school year and all subsequent
school years, each school district and charter school shall
hold an age-appropriate active shooter exercise in which
students, teachers, and other school employees participate
in and practice the procedures for safety and protection to
be implemented under such conditions.
590.010. As used in this chapter, the following terms
mean:
(1) "Commission", when not obviously referring to the
POST commission, means a grant of authority to act as a
peace officer;

SB 1300 8
(2) "Director", the director of the Missouri
department of public safety or his or her designated agent
or representative;
(3) "Peace officer", a law enforcement officer of the
state or any political subdivision of the state with the
power of arrest for a violation of the criminal code or
declared or deemed to be a peace officer by state statute;
(4) "POST commission", the peace officer standards and
training commission;
(5) "Reserve peace officer", a peace officer who
regularly works less than thirty hours per week;
(6) "School protection officer", an [elementary or
secondary school teacher or administrator] employee of a
school district or charter school who has been designated as
a school protection officer [by a school district].
590.205. 1. The POST commission shall establish
minimum standards for school protection officer training
instructors, training centers, and training programs.
2. The director shall develop and maintain a list of
approved school protection officer training instructors,
training centers, and training programs. The director shall
allow private companies to serve as training centers and
operate training programs under this section. The director
shall not place any instructor, training center, or training
program on its approved list unless such instructor,
training center, or training program meets all of the POST
commission requirements under this section and section
590.200. The director shall make this approved list
available to every school district in the state. The
required training to become a school protection officer
shall be provided by those firearm instructors, private and
public, who have successfully completed a department of

SB 1300 9
public safety POST certified law enforcement firearms
instructor school.
3. Each person seeking entrance into a school
protection officer training center or training program shall
submit a fingerprint card and authorization for a criminal
history background check to include the records of the
Federal Bureau of Investigation to the training center or
training program where such person is seeking entrance. The
training center or training program shall cause a criminal
history background check to be made and shall cause the
resulting report to be forwarded to the school district
where the [elementary school teacher or administrator]
employee is seeking to be designated as a school protection
officer.
4. No person shall be admitted to a school protection
officer training center or training program unless such
person submits proof to the training center or training
program that he or she has a valid concealed carry
endorsement or permit.
5. A certificate of school protection officer training
program completion may be issued to any applicant by any
approved school protection officer training instructor. On
the certificate of program completion the approved school
protection officer training instructor shall affirm that the
individual receiving instruction has taken and passed a
school protection officer training program that meets the
requirements of this section and section 590.200 and
indicate whether the individual has a valid concealed carry
endorsement or permit. The instructor shall also provide a
copy of such certificate to the director of the department
of public safety.

SB 1300 10
6. The POST commission shall establish requirements
for the continuing education of all school protection
officers. All school protection officers shall annually
receive twenty hours of firearms skill development training.
7. At least two times each year, all school protection
officers shall participate in a joint training on school
protection with a local law enforcement agency.
✓